Hawaii, session 2025, SB1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the establishment of a local, certified environmental toxins laboratory is necessary for the health and welfare of the State.  Hawaii's unique geographic location means that shipping samples to mainland laboratories can result in significant delays.  For example, during the 2021 Red Hill fuel spill, delays in shipping samples to the mainland resulted in residents' prolonged exposure to contaminated water.  A local laboratory would enable faster analysis and response to environmental incidents, ensuring that remedial actions can be taken promptly to protect public health and the environment. The legislature further finds that a local laboratory staffed with experts who have an understanding of Hawaii's unique environmental conditions and challenges, and who can accurately interpret test results accordingly, could help the State's leaders make informed decisions about environmental management and public health.  A local laboratory would also reduce the costs associated with shipping samples to mainland laboratories, which could be redirected towards other critical environmental and public health initiatives. The legislature further finds that having a local laboratory would enhance public trust in the testing process by providing greater transparency and accessibility to test results.  Residents would have confidence that their samples are being analyzed promptly and accurately by a trusted local institution.  A local laboratory would further provide valuable resources for research and educational institutions in the State, including opportunities for collaboration, internships, and hands-on learning experiences for students and researchers, fostering the next generation of environmental scientists and public health professionals. The legislature further finds that, in the event of natural disasters or other emergencies, having a local laboratory would ensure that Hawaii has the necessary infrastructure to quickly assess and address environmental hazards.  This capability is essential for protecting public health and the environment during crises. The legislature additionally finds that delays in receiving lab results due to shipping samples to the mainland can cause avoidable harm to human health and the environment.  For instance, during the COVID-19 pandemic, delays in testing and receiving results from mainland laboratories led to prolonged quarantine periods and delayed treatment for affected individuals.  A local laboratory would mitigate such delays and ensure timely access to critical health information. The legislature further finds that, without a local certified laboratory, the department of health cannot affirm and substantiate test results relating to environmental toxins.  Certified laboratories are essential for ensuring the accuracy and reliability of environmental toxin tests.  A local certified laboratory would promote timely and accurate results. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine to construct, establish, and operate a disease and environmental toxins testing laboratory to test samples submitted by the public for diseases; water, air, and soil quality; and complex testing. SECTION 2. Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-    Testing laboratory; established; diseases; quality of air, water, soil, and biological specimens.  (a) The university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall: (1)  Establish and operate a laboratory capable of: (A)  Testing for diseases; (B)  Testing for the presence of toxins in samples of air, water, soil, and biological and other specimens; and (C)  Conducting other high complexity testing; and (2)  Ensure that the laboratory complies with all applicable standards enumerated in the Clinical Laboratories Improvement Amendments of 1988, title 42 United States Code section 263a. (b)  The laboratory established pursuant to subsection (a) shall receive and analyze samples submitted by any person who reasonably believes that the sample contains disease or environmental toxins in violation of applicable law. (c)  In operating the laboratory, the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall ensure prompt and full public access to the results of analyses of all submissions of testing samples submitted to the laboratory.  The university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall provide complete reports of all submissions no later than ten days after receipt of the submissions." SECTION 3. The university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine may obtain and expend federal funds for the construction and operation of the testing laboratory established pursuant to this Act. However, if the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine is unable to obtain firm commitment from the federal government for the adequate financing of the laboratory within nine months of the effective date of this Act, the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall proceed expeditiously to construct and begin initial operations of the laboratory using the funds appropriated by this Act. SECTION 4. The university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine shall submit a report on its progress of establishing a laboratory pursuant to this Act, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 5. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing the construction of an environmental toxins testing laboratory. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii John A. Burns school of medicine for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________